Florida, session 2026, SB562.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSection 393.0665, Florida Statutes, is created 27 to read: 28 393.0665âCommunication Bill of Rights for Individuals with 29 Disabilities.â 30 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 31 (a)ââAlternative communication methodâ means a 32 communication technique or device that is evidence-based or 33 recognized by relevant professional organizations, including, 34 but not limited to, the American Speech-Language-Hearing 35 Association, and that allows an individual with a disability to 36 communicate independently without improper influence. 37 (b)ââHealth care providerâ means any facility licensed 38 under this chapter or a provider as defined in s. 408.803. 39 (c)ââIndividual with a disabilityâ means a person with a 40 developmental disability as defined in s. 393.063; a physical or 41 mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major 42 life activities; or any other disability as defined under state 43 or federal law, including the Americans with Disabilities Act. 44 (d)ââSchoolâ means any child care, early education, 45 elementary, secondary, or postsecondary educational setting. 46 (e)ââState agencyâ means a separate agency or unit of state 47 government created or established by law and any entity under 48 the control of or established for the benefit of a state agency. 49 (2)âCOMMUNICATION RIGHTS.â 50 (a)âAn individual with a disability has the right to 51 communicate in his or her preferred manner. A state agency, a 52 school, or a health care provider in this state may not restrict 53 or deny an individual with a disability access to his or her 54 preferred alternative communication method. 55 (b)âAlternative communication methods recognized under this 56 section include, but are not limited to, all of the following: 57 1.âAugmentative and alternative communication devices. 58 2.âLetterboards and typing-based communication. 59 3.âSign language and nonverbal gestural systems. 60 4.âSpeech-generating devices or other assistive 61 technologies. 62 (c)âIndividuals with disabilities have the right to: 63 1.âHave their preferred alternative communication method 64 recognized and supported in educational, health, and public 65 settings. 66 2.âAccess needed speech-language therapy and communication 67 support from licensed professionals without arbitrary 68 restrictions. 69 3.âHave reasonable access to trained staff in public 70 facilities or programs to support their specialized 71 communication needs. 72 4.âReceive communication support from trained staff, 73 including agency staff, direct-support professionals, educators, 74 and health care providers. 75 5.âBe free from bans or restrictions on their preferred 76 alternative communication methods. 77 (3)âAGENCY RESPONSIBILITIES.â 78 (a)âThe agency shall adopt rules to implement this section, 79 including a statement of rights and the obligations of staff and 80 providers required to observe the communication rights of 81 individuals with disabilities under this section. 82 (b)âThe agency shall develop training programs for direct 83 support professionals, educators, and health care staff. The 84 training must include, but need not be limited to, instruction 85 on all of the following: 86 1.âCommunication accommodations and alternative 87 communication methods. 88 2.âThe requirements of this section, including supporting 89 an individualâs preferred alternative communication method 90 unless another method is agreed upon by the individual or his or 91 her legal guardian. 92 (4)âCOMMUNICATION RIGHTS ADVISORY BOARD.âThe Communication 93 Rights Advisory Board is created within the agency to advise the 94 agency on matters relating to individuals with disabilities. 95 (a)âThe board shall be composed of 15 members, at least 7 96 of whom must be individuals with disabilities or family members 97 or guardians of individuals with disabilities and the remainder 98 of whom must be either professionals who, in the course of their 99 respective professions, treat or serve individuals with 100 disabilities or representatives of disability advocacy 101 organizations. Board members shall be appointed as follows: 102 1.âThree members appointed by the Governor. 103 2.âThree members appointed by the President of the Senate. 104 3.âThree members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 105 Representatives. 106 4.âThree members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 107 Senate. 108 5.âThree members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 109 House of Representatives. 110 (b)âThe board shall do all of the following: 111 1.âAdvise the agency on the implementation of this section. 112 2.âReview policies and practices to ensure compliance with 113 communication rights enumerated under this section. 114 3.âSubmit an annual report to the Governor, the President 115 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 116 (c)âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), this subsection is 117 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 118 through reenactment by the Legislature. 119 (5)âENFORCEMENT.â 120 (a)âThe agency shall establish procedures for individuals 121 with disabilities or their representatives to report violations 122 of this section. 123 (b)âViolations of this section are subject to a civil 124 penalty of $500 per violation in addition to any other 125 administrative action imposed in accordance with s. 393.0673 or 126 s. 408.813, as applicable, for such violation. 127 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.